Maryland, session 2025, HB1384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Howard County Board of Education shall study how best to:
(1) detect deadly weapons on Howard County public middle and high
school properties; and
(2) have schools rapidly report the detection of a deadly weapon to a law
enforcement agency.
(b) (1) The study required under this section shall include a comprehensive
audit of the current security infrastructure used in the Howard County public school
system.
(2) The audit shall include an evaluation of:
(i) physical and technological security measures currently in use;
and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1384*

HOUSE BILL 1384
(ii) any gaps or areas that require improvement within the current
security system.
(c) The study shall, at minimum, include an evaluation of:
(1) any available methods not currently used by the Howard County Public
School System, and the feasibility of using those methods, to help fill gaps or make
improvements in the security system identified in the comprehensive audit;
(2) how the current security system could best be adapted to achieve better
detection of deadly weapons and quicker reporting to law enforcement agencies when
deadly weapons have been detected;
(3) software that uses artificial intelligence to identify deadly weapons, and
the necessary steps to ensure that the software works effectively, including integration with
security cameras and other currently used safety measures;
(4) an increased use of security cameras in public middle and high schools
and their ideal placement; and
(5) an increased use of metal detectors, including handheld metal
detectors, in public middle and high school entrances.
(d) On or before October 1, 2025, in a manner that does not jeopardize school
safety, the Howard County Board of Education shall report on the findings of its study to
the State Superintendent of Schools and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Howard County Delegation to the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain in effect for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.